src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON PrtV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Preterite Endings for Vocalic Verb Stems
! +Err/Orth:X5 PrtV1 ; this gives čuorvvui, oinnii, the same as ^DISIMP, I comment it out
 :^DISIMP PrtV1 ;
 :Q2 PrtV2 ;

LEXICON PrtV1  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Preterite Endings for Vocalic Weak Grade Verb Stems
 +Sg3:j K ;
 +Du1:jme 12pflagK ;
 +Du2:jde 12pflagK ;
 +Du3:jga 12pflagK ;
 +Du2+Err/Orth:jbeahtti 12pflagK ;
 +Du3+Err/Orth:jba 12pflagK ;
 +Pl2+Err/Orth:jbehte%>t 12pflagK ;
 +Pl1:jmet 12pflagK ;
 +Pl2:jdet 12pflagK ;

LEXICON PrtV2  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Preterite Endings for Vocalic Strong Grade Verb Stems
 +Sg1:n 12pflagK ;
 +Sg2:t 12pflagK ;
 +Pl3: K ;

!! ### Consonantal stems


LEXICON PrtC  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Preterite Endings for Consonantal Verb Stems
 PrtC1 ;
 PrtC2 ;

LEXICON PrtC1  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Preterite Endings for Consonantal Contr./Non-Contr. Verb Stems
 +Sg1:in 12pflagK ;
 +Sg1+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:edje%>n 12pflagK ;
 +Sg2:it 12pflagK ;
 +Sg2+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:edje%>t 12pflagK ;
 +Pl3+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:e K ;
 +Pl3:edje K ;

LEXICON PrtC2  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Preterite Endings for Consonantal Non-Contr. Verb Stems
 +Sg3:ij K ;
 +Du1:eimme 12pflagK ;
 +Du2:eidde 12pflagK ;
 +Du3:eigga K ;
 +Pl1:eimme%>t 12pflagK ;
 +Pl2:eidde%>t 12pflagK ;

LEXICON PrtC3  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Preterite Endings for Consonantal Contr./Non-Contr. Verb Stems
 +Sg1:in 12pflagK ;
 +Sg1+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:edje%>n 12pflagK ;
 +Sg2:it 12pflagK ;
 +Sg2+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:edje%>t 12pflagK ;
 +Pl3+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:e K ;
 +Pl3:edje K ;


!! ## Imperative mood
! ---------------

LEXICON ImprtVA          !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Imperative Forms for Vocalic Verb Stems
 ImprtVB ;    !Prs: ImprtVB
 :Q6 ImprtSg2 ; !Prs:Q6 ImprtSg2

LEXICON ImprtVB          !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Imperative Forms for Vocalic Verb Stems
 ImprtV1 ;
 ImprtV2 ;

LEXICON ImprtV1          !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Imperative Forms for Vocalic Verb Stems
 +Sg1:Q3n 12pflag ;       ! bohton
 +Sg3:Q3s ENDLEX ;       ! bohtos
 +Du2:Y1 12pflag ;        ! boahtti
 +Du3:Q3ska 12pflag ;     ! bohtoska
 +Pl1+Dial/-KJ:Q3t 12pflag ;       ! bohtot
 +Pl1+Dial/-GG:Y4t 12pflag ;       ! boahttot iflg. Nickel/Sammallahti
 +Pl1+Err/Orth:Y2t 12pflag ;       ! vuolgut
 +Pl2+Err/Orth:Y1t 12pflag ;       ! boahttit !ikke i Nickel/Sammallahti
! +Pl1:Y3t ENDLEX ;      ! boahttut     ! This renders boahttet that are wrong
 +Pl2+Dial/-KJ:Q2t 12pflag ;       ! bohtet
 +Pl2+Dial/-GG:Y3t 12pflag ;       ! boahttet
 +Pl3:Q3set 12pflag ;     ! bohtoset
! +ConNegII:Q3 ENDLEX ; lifted up to Mother lexicas

LEXICON ImprtV2  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Imperative Forms for Vocalic Verb Stems and Substems
 +Du1:Y2 12pflag ;

LEXICON ImprtSg2  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Imperative Forms For Consonantal and Contracted Verb Stems
 +Sg2: 12pflagK ; ! boađehan
 +ConNeg: 12pflag ;


LEXICON ImprtC !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Imperative Substems for Consonantal Verb Stems - uneven syll.
 +Imprt+Err/Orth:eahºki%> ImprtVB ;
 +Imprt+ConNegII:eahºkiQ3 12pflag ;
 +Imprt:eatni%> ImprtV2 ;
 +Imprt+Du1+Err/Orth:eatnu K ;
 +Imprt+Sg1:ehko%>n 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Sg3:ehko%>s 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Sg3+Use/NG:us 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Du2:eahkki 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Du3:ehko%>ska 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-GG:ehko%>t 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-KJ:eatno%>t 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Pl2:ehke%>t 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Pl3:ehko%>set 12pflag ;

LEXICON ImprtC2 !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Imperative Substems for Consonantal Verb Stems - contracts
 +Imprt+Err/Orth:eahºki%> ImprtVB ;
 +Imprt+ConNegII:eahºkiQ3 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Dial/-KJ:eatni%> ImprtV2 ;
 +Imprt+Sg1:ehko%>n 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Sg3:ehko%>s 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Sg3+Use/NG:us 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Du1+Dial/-GG:eahkku 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Du2:eahkki 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Du3:ehko%>ska 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Pl1+Use/NG+Dial/-KJ:ehko%>t 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-KJ:edno%>t 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-GG:eahkko%>t 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Pl1+Use/NG+Dial/-GG:eatno%>t 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Pl2:ehke%>t 12pflag ;
 +Imprt+Pl3:ehko%>set 12pflag ;


!! # Infinite forms
! --------------


!! ## V- and C-final
! - - - - - - -

LEXICON NominalFormsV   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Vowel-final stems
 :X1 NominalFormsV1 ;
 :X4 NominalFormsV2 ;
 +Use/NG:Q6 NominalFormsV3 ;
 :X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +Use/-PLX:Q3 NominalFormsV5 ;
 +Use/-PLX:Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;
! check whether V7 and V8 should
! be deleted as V3 doublets
 :X6 NominalFormsV9 ; ! supine forms

LEXICON NominalFormsC  ! Cons-final stems
 NominalFormsC1 ;
 +Use/-PLX: NominalFormsC2 ;


!! ## Continuation lex
! - - - - - - - -

LEXICON NominalFormsVC !!≈ * **@CODE@**  for vowel final
 NominalFormsV1 ;
 NominalFormsV2 ;
 NominalFormsV4 ;

LEXICON NominalFormsV1 !!≈ * **@CODE@**   infinitiv, actio
 +Inf:t K ;
 +Actio+Nom:n K ;
 +Actio+Gen+Use/NG:n K ; ! (Re?)introducing?
 +Actio+Ess:me K ;
 +Actio+Ess+Use/NG:min K ;
 +Actio+Ess+Use/NG:men K ;
 +Actio+Loc:mis K ;
 +Actio+Com:mijn K ;

 +Actio+Gen+Der+Der/Adv+Adv+Err/Orth:ndihte K ;
 +Actio+Gen+Der+Der/Adv+Adv+Err/Orth:ndihtii K ;

LEXICON NominalFormsV2 !!≈ * **@CODE@**  gerund, verbgenitiv, verbabessive
 +Ger:dettiin K ;
 +Ger+Err/Orth:dettin K ;
 +Ger:dettiin%> PxC ;
 +Ger+Use/NG:din K ;
 +Ger+Use/NG:diin K ;
  VABESS ;
 +VGen: VGEN ;

LEXICON NominalFormsV3	 !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ^NG^ gerund
 +Ger+Use/NG:dettiin K ;
 +Ger+Use/NG+Err/Orth:dettin K ;
 +Ger+Use/NG:dettiin%> PxC ;
 +Ger+Use/NG:din K ;
 +Ger+Use/NG:diin K ;
  VABESS ;

LEXICON NominalFormsV4 !!≈ * **@CODE@**  perfect participe, preterite negation form
 +PrfPrc:n K ;
 +Ind+Prt+ConNeg:n K ;

LEXICON NominalFormsV5 !!≈ * **@CODE@**  negation form
 +Imprt+ConNegII:00 ENDLEX ; !Prs

LEXICON NominalFormsV6  !!≈ * **@CODE@** presence participe
 +PrsPrc+CmpNP/None:¤ Kflag ;

!LEXICON NominalFormsV7 !!≈ * __@CODE@__  gerund, verbabessive , same as NominalFormsV8!
! +Ger:dettiin K ;
! +Ger+Err/Orth:dettin K ;
! +Ger+Use/NG:din K ;
! +Ger+Use/NG:diin K ;
!  VABESS ;

LEXICON NominalFormsV8 !!≈ * **@CODE@**  gerund, verbabessive
 +Ger:dettiin K ;
 +Ger+Err/Orth:dettin K ;
 +Ger+Use/NG:din K ;
 +Ger+Use/NG:diin K ;
  VABESS ;

LEXICON NominalFormsV9 !!≈ * **@CODE@**  supine
 +Sup:žit K ; ! Rare form !!

LEXICON NominalFormsC1 !!≈ * **@CODE@**  for cons final stems: infinitive, supine, actio, gerund, perfect participe, preterite negation form
 +Inf:it K ;
 +Sup:eažžat K ; ! Rare form !!
! +Actio+Nom:eapmi K ;
! +Actio+Nom+Err/Orth:eapme K ;
 +Actio+Gen:an K ; ! shortened (reintro?)
 +Actio+Nom:an K ; ! shortened (reintro?)
 +Actio+Ess:eame K ;
! +Actio+Ess+Err/Orth:eami K ; ! iskkadeami is not Actio Ess
 +Actio+Ess+Err/Orth:eami%>n K ;
 +Actio+Ess+Dial/-GG:eame%>n K ;
 +Actio+Loc+Use/NG:eame%>s K ;
 +Actio+Loc:eami%>s K ;
 +Actio+Com:emi%>jn K ;
 +Ger:ettiin K ;
 +Ger+Err/Orth:ettin K ;
 +Ger:ettiin%> PxC ;
 +PrfPrc:an K ;
 +Ind+Prt+ConNeg:an K ;
! +VGen: K ; #this is very marginal, we can hardcode instead
 :# VABESS ;

LEXICON NominalFormsC2  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  for cons final stems: presence participe
 +PrsPrc+Use/-Spell:eaddji Kflag ;

LEXICON VABESS
 +VAbess:keahttá K ;
 +VAbess+Err/Orth-a-á:keahtta K ;
 +VAbess+Err/Orth-a-á:geahtta K ;
 +VAbess+Err/Orth:keahtá K ;
 +VAbess+Err/Orth:geahttá K ;
 +VAbess+Err/Orth:gehtte K ;
 +VAbess+Err/Orth:geahtá K ;
 +VAbess+Err/Orth:keahttái K ;
 +VAbess+Use/NG:keahttájin K ;
 +VAbess+Use/NG:haga K ;
 +Der4+Der/geahtes+A+Attr:keahtes K ;
 +Der4+Der/geahtes+A+Attr+Err/Orth:geahtes K ;
 +Der4+Der/geahtes+A+Attr+Err/Orth:geahtes K ;
 +Der4+Der/geahtes+A+Attr+Err/Orth:keahttes K ;


! ----------
!! # Derivation
! ----------

!LEXICON PRSPRCTOADJ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ SUB ! This is for PrsPrc as Adj.
! +PrsPrc+Use/-PLX:%>eaddji ENDLEX ; !     !Can only be Attr.
!+A+Sg+Nom: ENDLEX ; !SUB
!+A+Sg+Gen: ENDLEX ; !SUB
!+A+Sg+Acc: ENDLEX ; !SUB

!LEXICON DeverbalNounsV !nothing directed here right now
! DeverbalNounsBOAHTI ;
! DeverbalNounsDOHPPE- ;

LEXICON DeverbalNounsC !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 DeverbalNounsMUITAL ;
 DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJ ;

LEXICON DeverbalNounsCTV !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 DeverbalNounsMUITALTV ;
 DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJTV ;
