src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Humsubj-VerbRoot   !!= * **@CODE@**
biehttalit+V+TV+Err/Orth:biehtal VABESS ;
borgguhit+V+TV+Err/Orth:borggu VABESS ;
eahpidit+V+TV+Err/Orth:eahpi VABESS ;
eahpidit+V+TV+Err/Orth:eahppit VABESS ;
fuollat+V+TV+Err/Orth-a-á:fuolá VABESS ;
gáibidit+V+TV+Err/Orth:gájbi VABESS ;
gáržžidit+V+TV+Err/Orth:gáržže VABESS ;
juogadit+V+TV+Err/Orth:juoga VABESS ;
namuhit+V+TV+Err/Orth:namu VABESS ;
vealtat+V+IV+Err/Orth:vealta VABESS ;
vuordit+V+TV+Err/Orth:vuorde VABESS ;
vástidit+V+TV+Err/Orth:vásti VABESS;
LEXICON 3-VerbRoot
gollat+V+IV+Err/Orth-a-á:golá VABESS ;
